Utah, session 2026, HB604.
Section 1. Section 10-3-303 is enacted to read:10-3-303. Certain officials prohibited from serving in certain municipal offices.(1)As used in this section, "local executive official" means:(a)the elected county executive with the duties described in Title 17, Chapter 65, Part 3, Powers and Duties;(b)a county manager or county administrator, whether hired or appointed; or(c)the mayor or manager for a municipality, whether elected or appointed(2)Except as provided in Subsection (3), a local executive official may not serve on a municipal legislative body, whether the municipal legislative member is elected or appointed, if the municipality is the same as or within, in whole or in part, the political subdivision where the local executive official serves.(3)An individual who holds office in violation of Subsection (2) may continue to serve in the municipal legislative office:(a)if the individual was in violation of Subsection (2) on May 6, 2026, until the earlier of:(i)the day on which the individual's replacement, whether selected by election or appointment, is sworn into legislative office; or(ii)January 31, 2027; and(b)if Subsection (3)(a) does not apply, until the earlier of:(i)the day on which the individual's replacement, whether selected by election or appointment, is sworn into legislative office; or(ii)one year from the day that the violation first occurs.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 17-66-207 is enacted to read:17-66-207. Certain officials prohibited from serving in certain county offices.(1)As used in this section, "local executive official" means:(a)the elected county executive with the duties described in Title 17, Chapter 65, Part 3, Powers and Duties; or(b)a county manager or county administrator, whether hired or appointed.(2)Except as provided in Subsection (3), a local executive official may not serve on a county legislative body, whether the county legislative member is elected or appointed, in the same county where the local executive official serves.(3)An individual who holds office in violation of Subsection (2) may continue to serve in the county legislative office:(a)if the individual was in violation of Subsection (2) on May 6, 2026, until the earlier of:(i)the day on which the individual's replacement, whether selected by election or appointment, is sworn into legislative office; or(ii)January 31, 2027; and(b)if Subsection (3)(a) does not apply, until the earlier of:(i)the day on which the individual's replacement, whether selected by election or appointment, is sworn into legislative office; or(ii)one year from the day that the violation first occurs.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 63I-2-210 is amended to read:63I-2-210. Repeal dates: Title 10.(1)Subsection 10-2a-205(2)(b)(iii), regarding a feasibility study for the proposed incorporation of a community council area, is repealed July 1, 2028.(2)Section 10-2a-205.5, Additional feasibility consultant considerations for proposed incorporation of community council area -- Additional feasibility study requirements, is repealed July 1, 2028.(3)Subsection 10-3-303(3)(a), regarding eligibility to hold municipal legislative office while serving as a local executive official, is repealed July 1, 2027.(3)(4)Subsection 10-20-904(4)(c), regarding an inspection fee on a qualified water conservancy district, is repealed July 1, 2026.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 63I-2-217 is amended to read:63I-2-217. Repeal dates: Titles 17 through 17D.(1)Subsection 17-79-804(4)(c), regarding an inspection fee on a qualified water conservancy district, is repealed July 1, 2026.(2)Subsection 17-62-102(3), regarding the process for changing a form of county government, is repealed January 1, 2028.(3)Subsections 17-62-203(10) through (12), regarding the process to create a districting commission and implementing a district map, are repealed July 1, 2029.(4)Subsection 17-66-207(3)(a), regarding eligibility to hold county legislative office while serving as a local executive official, is repealed July 1, 2027.

Section 5:
Section 5.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.